Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-509
Hunting from aircraft; unlawful; exception; violation; penalty.

(1) It shall be unlawful for any person (a) while airborne in any aircraft to shoot or attempt to shoot for the purpose of killing any bird, fish, or other animal, (b) to use any aircraft to harass any bird, fish, or other animal, (c) to knowingly participate in using any aircraft for such purposes unless he or she is the holder of a currently valid permit issued under section 37-458 and engages only in activities permitted by such permit, or (d) to shoot or attempt to shoot any coyote from an aircraft under the authority of a permit issued under section 37-458 unless permission has first been obtained from the landowners or tenants over whose land the aircraft is to be used to shoot or attempt to shoot coyotes.

(2) Any person violating this section shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 1972, LB 1204, § 2;

Laws 1978, LB 216, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-232;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 229.